Wyoming statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 12 Highway Patrol

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic §§ 18, 23; 39 Am. Jur. Highways, Streets and Bridges § 379 et seq.

§ 24-12-101.
Established; composition; designation of rank; administrator appointed; to hold rank of colonel.

The highway patrol division within the department of transportation is established to consist of personnel to be appointed and designated as to rank by the administrator of the highway patrol. The director shall appoint an administrator of the highway patrol division who shall hold the rank of colonel.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 51, § 2; 1937, ch. 89, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 60-902; W.S. 1957, § 31-7; Laws 1967, ch. 50, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-2-101

; Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 1; ch. 56, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to director of department of transportation, see §

9-2-2004

.

§ 24-12-102.
Duties generally; emergencies; coordination.

The state highway patrol, acting under the direction of the director, shall enforce all the motor vehicle laws of this state. They shall also perform other duties assigned to them by the governor and are at all times subject to the call of the governor for emergency purposes at his discretion.

The administrator of the state highway patrol shall provide state troopers for security in the capitol building, Herschler state office building as provided in this subsection and governor’s residence and security for the governor. Security provided pursuant to this section is intended to provide protection for the statewide elected officials while in offices in the capitol building or Herschler state office building and members of the legislature during the legislative session or at the request of legislative staff when an interim committee meeting open to the public is held in the capitol building or Herschler state office building.

The state highway patrol shall coordinate with local, tribal, state and federal law enforcement agencies, the Wyoming office of homeland security and any other appropriate entity to operate an alert system under the integrated public alert and warning system or successor system, adhering to the United States department of justice criteria. The state highway patrol shall report annually to the division of criminal investigation the number of times and dates that the alert system was used, the age, race and gender of the abducted person, whether the abduction was thwarted and whether the alert system assisted in resolving the abduction. In addition:

If the Northern Arapaho and Eastern Shoshone tribes:

Operate or seek to operate an alert system under the integrated public alert and warning system or successor system on the Wind River Indian Reservation, adhering to the United States department of justice criteria, the Wyoming office of homeland security and state highway patrol shall assist and coordinate with any tribal agency in establishing or operating that system;

Report missing or endangered persons to the state highway patrol, the state highway patrol shall employ the alert system under this subsection to aid in the protection of persons and safe recovery of the reported missing or endangered persons.

The state highway patrol may also use or manage other alert systems to aid in the safe recovery of missing or endangered persons.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 51, § 3; 1937, ch. 89, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 60-903; W.S. 1957, § 31-9; W.S. 1977, §

31-2-103

; Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 1; ch. 56, § 1; 2001, ch. 45, § 1; 2015 ch. 91, § 1, effective March 2, 2015; 2020 ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2022 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to director of department of transportation, see §

9-2-2004

.

The 2015 amendment,

rewrote (b), which formerly read: “The administrator of the state highway patrol shall provide state troopers for law enforcement services for state personnel and state property in Laramie county, Wyoming. Security for personnel in the capitol building, governor's residence, other state buildings and security which may require travel outside Laramie county shall be provided as directed.”

Laws 2015, ch. 91, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (c).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “Indian” following “Wind River” in (c)(i)(A).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2001, ch. 45, § 3, transfers all personnel, equipment, and funding for the capitol police within the division of criminal investigation to the Wyoming highway patrol.

Improperly displayed out-of-state license plates justifies stop. —

A patrolman had a reason to suspect that the driver of car with Colorado license plate not displayed in accordance with Colorado law was violating Wyoming law, and he had authority to stop the car. Vargas-Rocha v. State, 891 P.2d 763,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1995).

Applied

in

Marvel v. Pursel, 65 Wyo. 395, 202 P.2d 656,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(1949).

§ 24-12-103.
Members to have powers of peace officers; exception.

All members of the state highway patrol shall have and exercise all the powers vested in peace officers, except the power to serve civil writs and processes.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 51, § 4; 1937, ch. 89, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 60-904; W.S. 1957, § 31-10; W.S. 1977, §

31-2-104

; Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 1; ch. 56, § 1.

Applied

in

Marvel v. Pursel, 65 Wyo. 395, 202 P.2d 656,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(1949).